Utah statutes.
62A-15-621.   Trespass -- Disturbance -- Penalty.
Any person who, without permission, enters any of the buildings or enclosures
appropriated to the use of patients, or makes any attempt to do so, or enters
anywhere upon the premises belonging to or used by the division, a local
mental health authority, or the state hospital and commits, or attempts to
commit, any trespass or depredation thereon, or any person who, either from
within or without the enclosures, willfully annoys or disturbs the peace or
quiet of the premises or of any patient therein, is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
